Wyoming, session 2025, SF0069.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlvi) is amended to read:
39-11-105. Exemptions.
(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:
(xlvi) A portion of a single family residential
structure and the associated improved land as a homeowner
tax exemption as provided in this paragraph. The following
shall apply to this exemption:
(A) The amount of the exemption under this
paragraph shall be twenty‑five percent (25%) of the fair
market value of a single family residential structure and
the associated improved land, provided that the exemption
shall only apply to the first one million dollars
($1,000,000.00) of the fair market value of the single
family residential structure and associated improved land.
The exemption provided by this paragraph shall not be
available to any person who has applied for and received
the tax exemption provided by paragraph (xlv) of this
subsection for the same property in the same tax year;
(B) As used in this paragraph, "single
family residential structure" means a structure intended
for human habitation including a house, modular home,
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0069
ENROLLED ACT NO. 60, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
mobile home, townhouse or condominium that is a privately
owned single family dwelling unit. Beginning with tax year
2026 and each tax year thereafter, "single family
residential structure" shall mean a single family
residential structure as defined in this subparagraph where
the person claiming the exemption actually resides for not
less than eight (8) months of the year. Beginning with tax
year 2026 and each tax year thereafter, if the person
claiming the exemption or a member of that person's
immediate family is an active duty member of the armed
forces and service in the armed forces is the reason that
the person claiming the exemption cannot meet the eight (8)
month requirement specified in this subparagraph, the
person shall qualify for the exemption if the single family
residential structure is the legal domicile of the
applicable member of the armed forces;
(C) Nothing in this paragraph shall
prohibit a taxpayer from paying the amount of property
taxes that would be due without the application of the
exemption provided in this paragraph.
Section 2. The exemption provided by this act shall
first apply to the tax year beginning January 1, 2025.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0069
ENROLLED ACT NO. 60, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3